Arkansas, session 2025, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-13-108(b), concerning the triage, treat,
and transport to alternative destination by an ambulance service operator, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) An Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, an
ambulance service's operators may triage and transport a patient to an
alternative destination in this state or treat in place if the ambulance
service is coordinating the care of the patient through telemedicine with a
physician for a medical-based complaint or with a behavioral health
specialist for a behavioral-based complaint.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-13-108, concerning the triage, treat,
and transport to alternative destination by ambulance service operators, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council shall develop a
set of protocols for 9-1-1 emergency medical situations that are exempt from
the telemedicine requirement under subsection (b) of this section by rule.
*ANS033*
03-10-2025 10:37:58 ANS033

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 H3/10/25 HB1285
(2) An ambulance service may:
(A) Adopt one (1) or more of the protocols developed under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section with the approval of the medical director
of the ambulance service; and
(B) Request that the council approve additional protocols
for 9-1-1 emergency medical situations to be exempt from the telemedicine
requirement under subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The council shall review annually all protocols exempted
from the telemedicine requirement developed under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section.

/s/L. Johnson
























03-10-2025 10:37:58 ANS033